Utah statutes.
16-16-205.   Liability for inaccurate information in filed record.
If a record delivered to the division for filing under this chapter and filed
by the division contains inaccurate information, a person that suffers a loss
by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from a person
that signed the record or caused another to sign it on the person's behalf and
knew at the time the record was signed that the information was inaccurate.
